North Carolina, session 2025, SB458.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "KinCare Act."
SECTION 2. Article 2A of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 95-25.12A. Sick leave plans.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Child. – A biological, foster, or adopted child; a stepchild; a legal ward; a child
of a domestic partner; or a child of a person standing in loco parentis.
(2) Employer. – Any person employing another under any appointment or
contract of hire. The term includes the State and any political subdivision of
the State.
(3) Family member. – A child, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, civil
union partner, parent, or grandparent of an employee; or a spouse, domestic
partner, or civil union partner of a parent or grandparent of the employee; or
a sibling of a spouse, domestic partner, or civil union partner of the employee;
or any other individual related by blood to the employee or whose close
association with the employee is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(4) Parent. – A biological, foster, or adoptive parent; a stepparent; or a legal
guardian.
(5) Sick leave. – Accrued increments of compensated or uncompensated leave
provided by an employer to an employee as a benefit of the employment for
use by the employee during an absence from the employment for any of the
following reasons:
a. The employee is physically or mentally unable to perform his or her
duties due to illness, injury, or a medical condition of the employee.
b. The absence is for the purpose of obtaining preventive health care or
professional diagnosis or treatment for a medical condition of the
employee.
c. The absence is for other medical reasons of the employee, such as
pregnancy or obtaining a physical examination.
d. The absence is necessary due to circumstances resulting from the
employee, or a family member of the employee, being a victim of
stalking or domestic or sexual violence, if the leave is to allow the
*S458-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
employee to obtain for the employee or the family member medical
attention needed to recover from physical or psychological injury or
disability caused by stalking or domestic or sexual violence, services
from a designated domestic violence agency or other victim services
organization, psychological or other counseling, relocation, or legal
services, including obtaining a restraining order or preparing for, or
participating in, any civil or criminal legal proceeding related to the
stalking or domestic or sexual violence.
(b) Any employer who provides compensated or uncompensated sick leave for
employees shall permit an employee to use, in any calendar year, the employee's accrued and
available sick leave entitlement to attend to the care of a family member for no more than five
consecutive days. All conditions and restrictions placed by the employer upon the use by an
employee of sick leave also shall apply to the use by an employee of sick leave to attend to the
care of a family member.
(c) This section does not extend the maximum period of leave to which an employee is
entitled under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. § 2606, et seq.),
regardless of whether the employee receives sick leave compensation during that leave.
(d) This section does not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any benefit provided under an employee welfare benefit plan subject to the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406, as
amended).
(2) Any insurance benefit, workers' compensation benefit, unemployment
compensation disability benefit, or other benefit not payable from the
employer's general assets.
(e) The rights and remedies specified in this section are cumulative and nonexclusive and
are in addition to any other rights or remedies afforded by contract or under other provisions of
law."
SECTION 3. G.S. 95-241(a)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(a) No person shall discriminate or take any retaliatory action against an employee
because the employee in good faith does or threatens to do any of the following:
(1) File a claim or complaint, initiate any inquiry, investigation, inspection,
proceeding or other action, or testify or provide information to any person
with respect to any of the following:
a. Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.
b. Article 2A or Article 16 of this Chapter.
c. Article 2A of Chapter 74 of the General Statutes.
d. G.S. 95-28.1.
e. Article 16 of Chapter 127A of the General Statutes.
f. G.S. 95-28.1A.
g. Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
h. Article 5F of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
i. G.S. 95-25.12A."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 458-First Edition